District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.07

Transfer of authority, functions, property, and personnel.

(a)

The following powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities are hereby transferred to the Department of Behavioral Health, effective October 1, 2013:

(1)

All real and personal property, Career and Excepted Service, Management Supervisory Service, trainee positions, assets, records, obligations, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Department of Mental Health and the Department of Health Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration, or relating to the powers, duties, functions, operations, and administration set forth in § 7-1141.06;

(2)

All of the functions assigned and authorities granted and delegated to the Director of the Department of Mental Health, and the Department of Mental Health, as set forth in Chapter 11A of this title [§ 7-1131.01 et seq.]; and

(3)

All of the functions assigned and authorities granted and delegated to the Department of Health Addiction Prevention and Recovery as set forth in section IV(A)(3) of Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1996, effective July 17, 1996 (D.C. Official Code, Vol. 3) [Part A of subchapter XIV of Chapter 15 of Title 1].

(b)

The following powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities are hereby transferred to the Department of Health, effective October 1, 2014:

(1)

All property, Career and Excepted Service, Management Supervisory Service, and trainee positions, personnel, assets, records, obligations, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Tobacco Control Program.

(2)

The Mayor shall coordinate, as necessary, the transfer from the Department to the Department of Health of any property, positions, personnel, assets, records, obligations, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds required for the management and operation of the Tobacco Control Program.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5118, 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5032, 61 DCR 9990
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (b).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5118 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5118 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5032 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5032 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5032 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.